Maryland, session 2025, SB0751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–1815.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FAMILY COUNCIL” MEANS A GROUP OF INDIVIDUALS
WHO WORK TOGETHER TO PROTECT THE RIGHTS OF AND IMPROVE THE QUALITY OF
LIFE OF THE RESIDENTS OF AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0751*

SENATE BILL 751
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM WITH
AT LEAST 15 BEDS.
(C) (1) A FAMILY COUNCIL FOR AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM MAY
CONSIST OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) MEMBERS OF A RESIDENT’S FAMILY; OR
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL APPOINTED BY THE RESIDENT OR, IF THE
RESIDENT IS INCAPABLE OF APPOINTING AN INDIVIDUAL, AN INDIVIDUAL
APPOINTED BY THE RESIDENT’S FAMILY.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, A
FAMILY COUNCIL MAY BE CREATED BY THE OWNER, OPERATOR, OR STAFF OF AN
ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, IN ORDER TO FACILITATE THE DEVELOPMENT OF A FAMILY COUNCIL,
THE OWNER, OPERATOR, OR STAFF OF AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM MAY LEAD
THE FAMILY COUNCIL FOR NOT LONGER THAN 6 MONTHS, AT WHICH TIME THE
FAMILY COUNCIL SHALL BE LED BY A MEMBER OF THE FAMILY COUNCIL.
(3) ON WRITTEN REQUEST OF A FAMILY COUNCIL, AN ASSISTED
LIVING PROGRAM MAY ASSIST THE FAMILY COUNCIL IN THE ADMINISTRATIVE
FUNCTIONS OF OPERATING THE FAMILY COUNCIL IN A MUTUALLY AGREED–ON
MANNER.
(D) AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE EACH NEW OR
PROSPECTIVE RESIDENT THE FOLLOWING WRITTEN INFORMATION ABOUT THE
FAMILY COUNCIL:
(1) THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND PHONE NUMBER OF A CURRENT
MEMBER OF THE FAMILY COUNCIL;
(2) A BRIEF DESCRIPTION OF THE PURPOSE AND FUNCTION OF THE
FAMILY COUNCIL;
(3) INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW THE RESIDENT OR PROSPECTIVE
RESIDENT MAY REVIEW THE PUBLIC FILES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(4) THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND PHONE NUMBER OF THE STATE OR
LOCAL OMBUDSMAN.

SENATE BILL 751 3
(E) AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM SHALL RESPOND IN WRITING TO ANY
WRITTEN GRIEVANCE OR OTHER WRITTEN COMMUNICATION FROM THE FAMILY
COUNCIL WITHIN 14 CALENDAR DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A COMMUNICATION.
(F) (1) AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM SHALL CREATE AND MAINTAIN A
PUBLIC CORRESPONDENCE FILE AND A REGULATORY CORRESPONDENCE FILE FOR
COMMUNICATIONS WITH A FAMILY COUNCIL.
(2) THE CORRESPONDENCE FILES SHALL INCLUDE A COPY OF EACH
WRITTEN COMMUNICATION AND RESPONSE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION.
(3) (I) THE RECORDS IN THE REGULATORY FILE SHALL BE
UNEDITED.
(II) THE RECORDS IN THE PUBLIC FILE SHALL DELETE ANY
INFORMATION THAT IDENTIFIES AN INDIVIDUAL RESIDENT.
(4) THE PUBLIC FILE MAY BE REVIEWED BY A RESIDENT, A
PROSPECTIVE RESIDENT, OR THE REPRESENTATIVE OF EITHER A RESIDENT OR A
PROSPECTIVE RESIDENT DURING NORMAL BUSINESS HOURS AND AT ANY OTHER
TIME THE ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM AGREES TO MAKE THE PUBLIC FILE
AVAILABLE.
(5) THE ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM SHALL PROMPTLY COMPLY WITH
A REQUEST BY A LICENSING AUTHORITY TO REVIEW THE RECORDS IN EITHER THE
PUBLIC OR REGULATORY FILES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.